Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 3
CRIMINAL PENALTIES

5-5-301. Willful violations.

A supervised lender who willfully makes charges in excess of those permitted by the provisions of this code commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

A person, other than a supervised financial organization, who willfully engages in the business of making supervised loans without a license in violation of the provisions of this code applying to the authority to make supervised loans described in section 5-2-301 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

A person who willfully engages in the business of making consumer credit transactions or of taking assignments of rights against consumers arising therefrom and undertakes direct collection of payments or enforcement of these rights without complying with the provisions of this code concerning notification contained in section 5-6-202 or payment of fees contained in section 5-6-203 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section and by the same act or acts violates the provisions of section 18-15-104 or 18-15-107, C.R.S., or both, shall be prosecuted for the violation of either or both of said sections and not for a violation of this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1243, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3133, § 54, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-301, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-302. Disclosure violations.

A person commits a class 2 misdemeanor if such person willfully and knowingly:

Gives false or inaccurate information or fails to provide information that such person is required to disclose under the provisions of this code on disclosure and advertising or of any related rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to this code;

Uses any rate table or chart in a manner which consistently understates the annual percentage rate determined according to those provisions; or

Otherwise fails to comply with any requirement of the provisions of this code on disclosure and advertising or of any related rule of the administrator adopted pursuant to this code.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1244, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3133, § 55, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-302, as it existed prior to 2000.